Utah statutes.
53A-12-101.   Schools to be free -- Age limitations.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Title 53A, in each school district the
public schools shall be free to all children between five and 18 years of age
who are residents of the district, and also to persons over 18 who are
domiciled in the state of Utah and have not completed high school.
(2)  A person over the age of 18 taking courses under this section must
declare an intent to complete requirements for a high school diploma.  All
courses taken must lead toward that diploma and must be approved by those
directly responsible for administering the program.
(3)  A person required to pay tuition under this section may have the tuition
waived under Section 53A-15-404.
